csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_C.yaml
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: waabamangidwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: waabamaasiwangwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: waabamangwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3PlProx: waabamaasiwindwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3PlProx: waabamindwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamigosiinigwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamigonigwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: [waabamimaasiwaawagen,waabamimaasiiwagen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaawagen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: [waabamimaasiwaawegwen,waabamimaasiiwegwen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaawegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: [waabamimaasiwaawaden,waabamimaasiiwaden]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaawaden
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: [waabamaasiwaawaagwen,waabamaasiiwaagwen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaawaagwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaasiigwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaagwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: [waabamimaasiwaawangiden,waabamimaasiiwangiden]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaawangiden
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: [waabamimaasiwaawangen,waabamimaasiiwangen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaawangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: [waabamimaasiwaawinden,waabamimaasiiwinden]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaawinden
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamigosinig
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamigonid
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwag
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimag
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiweg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimeg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwad
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimad
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaasigwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaawaad
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaasig
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaad
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwangid
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimangid
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwind
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimind
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamigosinigoban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamigonipan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwagiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimagiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwadiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimadiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaasigwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaawaapan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaasigoban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaapan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwangidiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimangidiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwindiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimindiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: waabamigosiigwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: waabamigogwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: [waabamaasiwaawagen,waabamaasiiwagen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: waabamaawagen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: [waabamaasiwaawegwen,waabamaasiiwaaweg]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: waabamaawegwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: [waabamaasiwaawaden,waabamaasiiwaden]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: waabamaawaden
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: waabamigosiigwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: waabamigogwen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: [waabamaasiwaawangiden,waabamaasiiwangiden]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: waabamaawangiden
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: [waabamaasiwaawangen,waabamaasiiwangen]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: waabamaawangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgProx: [waabamaasiwaawinden,waabamaasiiwinden]
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3SgProx: waabamaawinden
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: waabamigosig
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: waabamigod
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: waabamaasiwag
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: waabamag
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: waabamaasiweg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: waabameg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: waabamaasiwad
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: waabamad
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: waabamigosig
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: waabamigod
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: waabamaasiwangid
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: waabamangid
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: waabamaasiwang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: waabamang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3SgProx: waabamaasiwind
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProx: waabamind
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: waabamigosigoban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: waabamigopan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: waabamaasiwagiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: waabamagiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: waabamaasiwegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: waabamegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: waabamaasiwadiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: waabamadiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: waabamigosigoban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: waabamigopan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: waabamangidiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: waabamangidiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: waabamaasiwangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: waabamangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3SgProx: waabamaasiwindiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3SgProx: waabamindiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: waabamigosiiwaangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: waabamigowaangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+Excl: waabamisiiwaangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+Excl: waabamiwaangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+Excl: waabamisiiwaangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+Excl: waabamiwaangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: waabamisiiwangidwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: waabamiwangidwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: waabamisiiwangiden
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: waabamiwangiden
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+Excl: waabamigoosiiwaangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+Excl: waabamigoowaangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: waabamigosiwaang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: waabamigoyaang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+Excl: waabamisiwaang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl: waabamiyaang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+Excl: waabamisiwaang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl: waabamiyaang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: waabamisiwangidwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: waabamiyangidwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: waabamisiwangid
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: waabamiyangid
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+Excl: waabamigoosiwaang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+Excl: waabamigooyaang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: waabamigosiwaangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: waabamigoyaangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+Excl: waabamisiwaangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+Excl: waabamiyaangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+Excl: waabamisiwaangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+Excl: waabamiyaangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: waabamisiwangidwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: waabamiyangidwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: waabamisiwangidiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: waabamiyangidiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+Excl: waabamigoosiwaangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+Excl: waabamigooyaangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: waabamigosiiwangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: waabamigowangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: waabamisiinowangwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: waabaminowangwaawen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: waabamisiinowangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: waabaminowangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+Incl: waabamigoosiiwangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+Incl: waabamigoowangen
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: waabamigosiwang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: waabamigoyang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: waabamisinowangwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: waabaminangwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: waabamisinowang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: waabaminang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+Incl: waabamigoosiwang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+Incl: waabamigooyang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: waabamigosiwangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: waabamigoyangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: waabamisinowangwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: waabaminangwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: waabamisinowangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: waabaminangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+Incl: waabamigoosiwangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+Incl: waabamigooyangiban
